Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,112
Nonresident licensed vehicle hauling
grain or seasonally harvested products; permit; fee.

If a
truck, truck-tractor, or trailer is lawfully licensed under the laws of another
state or province and is engaged in hauling grain or other seasonally harvested
products from the field where they are harvested to storage or market during
the period from June 1 to December 15 of each year or under emergency conditions,
the right to operate over the highways of this state for a period of ninety
days shall be authorized by obtaining a permit therefor from the county treasurer or
his or her agent of the county in which grain is first hauled. Such permit
shall be issued electronically upon the payment of a fee of twenty dollars
for a truck or one hundred fifty dollars for any combination of truck, truck-tractor,
or trailer. The fees for such permits, when collected, shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 112;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 68.